Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.105

Development regulations—Consistency with comprehensive plan.

Beginning July 1, 1992, the development regulations of each code city that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall not be inconsistent with the city's comprehensive plan. For the purposes of this section, "development regulations" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 36.70A.030.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 23.]

NOTES:

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.